Connecticut, session 2026, SB00320.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) The Commissioner of Energy
2 and Environmental Protection shall convene a working group within
3 the Department of Energy and Environmental Protection to study and
4 make recommendations concerning: (1) The siting and use of electric
5 transmission facilities in the state, and (2) long-term electric grid
6 interconnection and capacity planning.
7 (b) The working group established pursuant to this section shall
8 examine: (1) Any identified or potential delays in the siting of electric
9 transmission facilities in the state caused by administrative inefficiency
10 or a lack of interagency coordination, (2) the need for electric grid
11 enhancements, including additional interconnection points, required in
12 connection with the increased development of distributed generation
13 sources in the state, (3) any potential cost-sharing or cost-shifting
SB320 / File No. 276 1

SB320 File No. 276
14 mechanisms to ensure that future developers of distributed generation
15 sources do not bear an inequitable amount of the cost for necessary
16 electric transmission or distribution infrastructure improvements, and
17 (4) any other topics the commissioner deems relevant to the working
18 group.
19 (c) The commissioner shall select the members of such working
20 group, provided such working group shall, at a minimum, include (1)
21 the commissioner, or the commissioner's designee; (2) the chairperson
22 of the Public Utilities Regulatory Authority, or the chairperson's
23 designee; (3) the Consumer Counsel, or the counsel's designee; (4) the
24 Secretary of the Office of Policy and Management, or the secretary's
25 designee; (5) the Commissioner of Administrative Services, or the
26 commissioner's designee; and (6) one or more representatives of the
27 electric distribution companies, as defined in section 16-1 of the general
28 statutes.
29 (d) Not later than July 1, 2027, the commissioner shall submit a report,
30 in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes,
31 to the joint standing committee of the General Assembly having
32 cognizance of matters relating to energy and technology that details the
33 findings of the working group and makes recommendations for any
34 legislation related to the siting and use of electric transmission facilities
35 in the state and long-term electric grid interconnection and capacity
36 planning.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
ET Joint Favorable
SB320 / File No. 276 2

SB320 File No. 276
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill requires the Commissioner of the Department of Energy and
Environmental Protection (DEEP) to establish a working group to study
the siting and use of electric transmission facilities in the state, and long-
term electric grid interconnection and capacity planning. This does not
result in a cost to the state as the working group has the staff and
expertise necessary to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB320 / File No. 276 3

SB320 File No. 276
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 320
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A WORKING GROUP CONCERNING
ELECTRIC TRANSMISSION FACILITIES AND ELECTRIC GRID
CAPACITY PLANNING.